Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.200

Forms or equivalents prescribed.

The forms or equivalent forms as set forth in RCW 12.04.201 through 12.04.208 may be used by justices of the peace, in civil actions and proceedings under this chapter.

[ 1957 c 89 s 3. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]